Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 667. MULTIPLE EMPLOYMENTS WITH STATE

Sec. 667.001. GENERAL PROVISIONS. (a) This chapter applies to a person who is or may become employed by more than one state agency or institution of higher education.

(b) A person who is employed by more than one state agency or institution of higher education may not receive benefits from the state that exceed the benefits provided for one full-time employee.

(c) The person must be informed of the requirements of this chapter before the person is employed by more than one agency or institution.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 667.002. SEPARATE RECORDS REQUIRED. Separate vacation and sick leave records must be maintained for each employment.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 666.002 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 667.003. TRANSFER OF LEAVE BALANCES PROHIBITED. If the person separates from one employment, the person's leave balances that were accrued under that employment may not be transferred to the remaining employments.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.003 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 667.004. ACCRUAL OF STATE SERVICE CREDIT. The person accrues state service credit for all purposes as if the person had only one employment.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.004 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 667.005. GROUP INSURANCE CONTRIBUTION. The total state contribution toward the person's group insurance is limited to the amount specified in the General Appropriations Act for a full-time active employee.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.005 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 667.006. OVERTIME COMPENSATION. (a) Overtime compensation accrues for each employment independently of every other employment, except as provided by Subsection (b).

(b) If the person is subject to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.) in an employment, the employing agencies and institutions of higher education shall ensure that the person is compensated for all combined time actually worked that exceeds 40 hours per week in accordance with the overtime provisions of the federal law. The agencies and institutions shall cooperate to determine which agency or institution is responsible for ensuring that the employee is properly compensated according to those provisions.

(c) An employing agency or institution may not use multiple employments of an employee within the same agency or institution for the purpose of:

(1) paying the employee for working more than 40 hours in a week instead of earning compensatory time in accordance with state law; or

(2) paying the employee a greater salary than is allowed for either of the employee's positions.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.006 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 667.007. INFORMING EMPLOYER ABOUT MULTIPLE EMPLOYMENT. The person must inform the person's employing state agencies or institutions of higher education before accepting an additional employment with another agency or institution.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.007 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 667.008. SPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. If a person's multiple employment involves only legislative agencies and all employments are less than full-time, the person may use paid leave from leave balances in all employments, and on separating from one employment, leave balances accrued under that employment will be transferred to the remaining employments.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.008 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 667.009. SPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR UNIVERSITY SYSTEMS. (a) A university system as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code, may establish a policy that defines a person's employment as the total hours the person is assigned:

(1) to one component of the system; or

(2) to all components of the system.

(b) The policy may apply to a person only if the person is employed by more than one institution of higher education and all the employing institutions are within the same university system.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 279, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 666.009 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(60), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.